Utah statutes.
20A-1-611.   Cost of defense of action.

Nothing contained in this chapter prevents any candidate from employing counsel to represent him in any action or proceeding affecting his rights as a candidate or from paying all costs and disbursements arising from that representation.



Amended by Chapter 396, 2011 General Session

